Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-173
Brand clearance, defined.

Brand clearance means the documentary evidence of ownership that is issued and signed by a brand inspector and given to persons who have legally purchased cattle at a livestock auction or sale where a brand inspection service is provided. The brand clearance shall give the name and address of sale or auction where issued, the name of purchaser, the number and sex of cattle, any brands, the location of any brands on the cattle, and any approved nonvisual identifiers.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB572, § 11.